Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 9

Taxation

45-3-901. Applicable taxes and exemptions.

Associations shall be subject to the franchise and excise taxes as set forth in title 67, chapter 4, parts 8 and 9 respectively, and the taxes shall be in lieu of and substitution for any and all other taxes previously levied against or on the associations; except ad valorem taxes upon real estate and tangible personal property owned by the associations and, for taxable periods beginning on and after midnight June 30, 1977, the franchise and excise taxes as set forth in title 67, chapter 4, parts 8 and 9 respectively. Members' savings accounts shall not be treated as capital stock in the franchise tax base set forth in title 67, chapter 4, part 9. The exemption from other taxes shall include taxes upon or for the use of the capital, notes, reserves, surplus, loans, accounts, and other income and profits of the associations, including income tax upon members, shareholders or account-holders, who receive dividends from the associations, and all privilege taxes of every kind imposed by the state of Tennessee. Nothing in this section shall be construed as relieving state associations of the expense of examinations as provided by §45-3-1003(f).

Acts 1939, ch. 60, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3898.61 (Williams, § 3918.12); Acts 1977, ch. 85, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 708, §§ 1.23, 3.12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1504; Acts 1984, ch. 558, § 2; T.C.A., §45-3-904.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-3-904 to §45-3-901 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

Cross-References. Excise tax, imposition upon savings and loan associations, §67-4-2007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 10.